hfst/cs-som-lex.txt
LEXICON Subjunction 
CS;
FOC ;

! Questions come in here somewhere. miyaan, maxaan, miyuu, muxuu
! TODO: waxaa/wuxuu broken
!       waxuu   waxa+FocR#uu+Cl+Pron+Pers+SgMasc3

! TODO: have to decide what to do about the paths here.
! waxa+FocR#uu+Cl+Pron+Pers+SgMasc3
! waxa+FocR+uu+Cl+Pron+Pers+SgMasc3 


LEXICON CS
oo+CS:oo FINAL ;
ma+CS+Neg:ma FINAL "not" ;
ha+CS+Imper+Neg:ha FINAL "don't" ;
laakiin+CS:laakiin FINAL "but" ; 
in+CS:in Clit_prep2 ;
in+CS:in FINAL ;
sidee+CS:sidee FINAL ;
! forms: sidoo, sidaas 'so (result); why'
! sidee+CS:sid Clit_prep2 ;
! sid
! sidaa
! sidaan
! sidaas
! sidaas darteed
! sidaasi
! sidaasna
! sidan
! sidatan
! siday
! sidee
! sideed
! sideeda
! sideedaad
! sideedda
! sideetan
! sidii
! sidiisii
! sido
! sidoo
! sidooo
! siduu

! ! sidda
! ! sidday
! ! siddeed
! ! siddeed iyo toban
! ! siddeedaad
! ! siddeedda
! ! siddeetamaadkii
! ! siddeetan
! ! siddeetanaad
! ! siddo
! ! siddoo

LEXICON FOC
waxa+CS+Foc/R:wax{#} Clit_prep ;
waa+CS+Foc/V:w Clit_prep2 ;
baa+CS+Foc/L:b Clit_prep2 ;
ayaa+CS+Foc/L:ay Clit_prep2 ;

! Negative comes in between these. wax-aan-aynu, b-aan-an, what is 'wax-aan-a'? 'waxanu'?

! inaanay

LEXICON Clit_prep
Clit_pron_short_tag ;
+Null:a FINAL ; ! Allow focus markers etc., to stand on own
+Nul:aa FINAL ; ! Not sure which is right here.


LEXICON Clit_prep2
Clit_pron_short_tag ;
+Null:aa FINAL ;
